Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

42-12-101. Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Collector" means an individual or person who is:

The owner of one or more vehicles of historic or special interest who collects, purchases, acquires, trades, or disposes of these vehicles or parts thereof for such owner's use in order to preserve, restore, and maintain a vehicle for hobby purposes or use; or

A bona fide member of a national automobile club or association whose charter recognizes in membership a sincere demonstration of interest in the history of automotive engineering, in the preservation of antique, vintage, or special interest motor vehicles, in a sharing of knowledge and experience with other automotive enthusiasts, or in the promotion of good fellowship among such members or collectors.

"Collector's item" means a motor vehicle, including a truck or truck tractor, that is of:

Model year 1975 or earlier;

Model year 1976 or later that was registered as a collector's item prior to September 1, 2009; except that a vehicle so registered is not eligible for registration as a collector's item upon sale or transfer to a new owner; or

A model year at least thirty-two years old unless the vehicle was registered before September 1, 2009, and meets the requirements of paragraph (b) of this subsection (2). If the vehicle is being registered under this paragraph (c) and in the program area, as defined in section 42-4-304:

The vehicle must have passed an emissions test meeting the standards of part 3 of article 4 of this title within the last twelve months before being initially registered by the owner as a collector's item; and

The owner must sign an affidavit that the vehicle will not be driven on roadways for more than four thousand five hundred miles per year.

"Commercial vehicle" means a trailer, truck, or truck tractor, as those terms are defined in section 42-1-102.

"Dealer" means a person who is engaged in the business or vocation of manufacturing, buying, selling, trading, destroying, or salvaging motor vehicles, motor vehicle parts, motor vehicle equipment, or motor vehicle accessories.

"Department" means the department of revenue.

"Director" means the executive director of the department of revenue.

"Garage" means a building or business place used for the storage or repair of motor vehicles.

"Inspector" means a peace officer of a law enforcement agency who has been certified under section 42-5-206 to inspect vehicle identification numbers.

"Law enforcement agency" means the Colorado state patrol or the agency of a local government authorized to enforce the laws of Colorado.

"Motor vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle designed for operation on the highway and not running on rails.

"Parts car" means a motor vehicle, generally in inoperable condition, that is owned by a collector to furnish or to supply parts that are usually unobtainable from normal sources, thus enabling a collector or other collectors to preserve, restore, complete, and maintain a vehicle of historic or special interest.

"Rebuilt vehicle" means a vehicle that was assembled from parts of two or more commercially manufactured vehicles or that has been altered in such a manner that it is not readily recognizable as a commercially manufactured vehicle of a given year. "Rebuilt vehicle" includes a kit car and a street-rod vehicle.

"State" includes the territories and the federal districts of the United States.

"Street-rod vehicle" means a vehicle with a body design manufactured in 1948 or earlier or with a reproduction component that resembles a 1948 or earlier model that has been modified for safe road use, including modifications to the drive train, suspension, and brake systems, modifications to the body through the use of materials such as steel or fiberglass, and modifications to other safety or comfort features.

"Vehicle" means a motor vehicle required to have a certificate of title under part 1 of article 6 of this title but does not include commercial vehicles.

"Vehicle identification number" means the identifying number, serial number, engine number, or other distinguishing number or mark, including any letters, that is unique to the identity of a given vehicle or vehicle part and that was placed on a vehicle or vehicle part by its manufacturer or by the department under either section 42-12-202 or the laws of another state or country.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 232, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (HB 13-1071), ch. 370, p. 2160, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

IP(2)(c) amended, (HB 14-1056), ch. 23, p. 154, § 2, effective March 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (11) is similar to former § 42-12-101 (3) as it existed prior to 2011.

42-12-102. Rebuilder's certificate of title.

If the applicant for a certificate of title to a motor vehicle is unable to provide the director or the authorized agent with a certificate of title duly transferred to the applicant or other evidence of ownership that satisfies the director that the applicant owns the vehicle, the director may issue a rebuilder's title for a motor vehicle valued principally because of the vehicle's early date of manufacture, design, or historical interest or valued as a collector's item if:

The motor vehicle is not roadworthy;

The motor vehicle is at least twenty-five years old;

The components of the motor vehicle include at least a rolling chassis;

The application contains or is accompanied by a statement that complies with paragraph (b) of this subsection (1);

The applicant obtains a certified vehicle identification number inspection; and

The applicant provides surety that complies with subsection (3) of this section.

The statement required by subparagraph (IV) of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) must contain an account of the facts by which the applicant acquired ownership of the vehicle, the source of the title to the vehicle, and such other information as the director may require. The statement must contain a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury in the second degree, as defined in section 18-8-503, C.R.S.

If a motor vehicle titled under this section is later made roadworthy, the department shall issue to an applicant a standard certificate of title if the applicant:

Obtains a certified vehicle identification number inspection; and

Furnishes a bond under subsection (3) of this section.

To convert a rebuilder's title to a standard certificate of title, the applicant shall furnish evidence of a savings account, deposit, or certificate of deposit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101, C.R.S., or a good and sufficient bond with a corporate surety. The account, deposit, certificate, or bond must be in an amount fixed by the director, but not less than twice the reasonable value of the vehicle, determined as of the time of application. The applicant and the applicant's surety shall hold harmless any person who suffers loss or damage by reason of the filing of a certificate of title under this section.

If a person suffers loss or damage by reason of the filing of a certificate of title under this section, the person has a right of action against the applicant and the surety on the applicant's bond, against either of whom the person damaged may proceed independently of the other.

A person shall not drive a motor vehicle titled under this section on the highways until it complies with subsection (5) of this section.

The department or its authorized agent shall not classify a vehicle issued a title under this section as a salvage vehicle.

If the motor vehicle's frame and body identification numbers do not match the manufacturer's numbering system as being originally mated or if the motor vehicle is reconstructed from salvage parts or other motor vehicles or reproduction parts, an application for title using subsection (1) or (2) of this section must include evidence of ownership of the parts, other motor vehicles, or reproduction components used in the reconstruction. If the evidence is not acceptable to the director, the director shall reject the application for certificate of title.

The evidence required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) must include or be accompanied by an affidavit stating the facts concerning the reconstruction and an affidavit of physical inspection that includes a computer check of the state and national compilations of wanted and stolen vehicles.

Before issuing a certificate of title under paragraph (a) of this subsection (5), the department shall issue a special vehicle identification number to the vehicle.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 234, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-6-108.5 as it existed prior to 2011, and the former § 42-12-102 was relocated to § 42-12-401.

42-12-103. Furnishing bond for certificates.

If a collector's item, street-rod vehicle, or horseless carriage is twenty-five years old or older, the applicant has had a certified vehicle identification number inspection performed on the vehicle, and the applicant presents a notarized bill of sale within twenty-four months after the sale with the title application, then the applicant need not furnish surety under section 42-6-115 (3). To be excepted from the surety requirement, an applicant shall submit to the department a sworn affidavit, under penalty of perjury, stating that the required documents submitted are true and correct.

If any person suffers loss or damage by reason of the filing of the certificate of title as provided in this section, the person shall have a right of action against the applicant and the surety on the applicant's bond, against either of whom the person damaged may proceed independently of the other.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 235, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

The former § 42-12-103 was relocated to § 42-12-402 in 2011.

42-12-104. Applicability of articles 1, 3, 4, 5, and 6.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, articles 1, 3, 4, 5, and 6 of this title apply to the titling and registration of a motor vehicle.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article amended with relocations, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 236, § 1, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

The former § 42-12-104 (1) and (3) were relocated to § 42-12-403, and the former § 42-12-104 (2) was relocated to § 42-12-404, in 2011.

42-12-105. Evidence of ownership of parts - copy of nonrepairable title.

The director may accept a copy of the nonrepairable title as evidence of ownership of a part when the part is used to restore another vehicle under this article.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1100), ch. 122, p. 438, § 7, effective August 6.